Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE B. TEXAS WORKFORCE COMMISSION; WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT; EMPLOYMENT SERVICES

For expiration of this chapter, see Section 319.006.

CHAPTER 319. TASK FORCE ON CONSOLIDATION OF WORKFORCE AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Sec. 319.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "task force" means the task force established under this chapter to develop a plan for the consolidation of workforce development and social services programs in this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2315), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 319.002. TASK FORCE MEMBERSHIP; COMPENSATION. (a) The task force consists of:

(1) three members appointed by the governor;

(2) three members appointed by the lieutenant governor; and

(3) three members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(b) A vacancy on the task force must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

(c) Members of the task force serve without compensation or reimbursement for expenses.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2315), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 319.003. TASK FORCE DUTIES. (a) The task force shall:

(1) develop a plan for best courses of action and a regulatory framework for the consolidation of workforce development programs administered by the commission and social services programs administered by the Health and Human Services Commission; and

(2) make recommendations to the legislature regarding the consolidation of programs described by Subdivision (1).

(b) The consolidation plan developed by the task force must:

(1) examine all state resources, including financial, manpower, and technology resources, to determine if those resources are being used effectively and efficiently to achieve the desired outcomes for recipients of the workforce development and social services programs and for the purposes of the programs' intended goals;

(2) identify opportunities for cost savings or reallocations of resources to improve the effectiveness of the programs by streamlining essential functions and eliminating duplicative efforts;

(3) identify potential improvements to child-care data systems in order to streamline child-care data collection as necessary to evaluate the need for and availability of subsidized and unsubsidized child care for recipients of program services;

(4) be designed to improve the delivery of the programs by ensuring that applicants for and recipients of the services provided are better served by having access to a single point of contact case manager for all services sought or received; and

(5) identify the changes to federal law that would be necessary to implement the consolidation plan.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2315), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 319.004. ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT. The commission and the Health and Human Services Commission shall provide staff and administrative support as necessary to enable the task force to carry out its duties under this chapter, including by providing:

(1) meeting space;

(2) staff to assist the task force in conducting research and drafting the consolidation plan and related materials; and

(3) funding available from existing resources appropriated to the commission or the Health and Human Services Commission to pay for costs associated with the task force's functions.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2315), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 319.005. REPORT TO LEGISLATURE. Not later than December 31, 2024, the task force shall prepare and submit to the legislature a report that includes:

(1) a description of the activities of the task force;

(2) the consolidation plan developed by the task force; and

(3) the findings and recommendations of the task force.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2315), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 319.006. EXPIRATION. The task force is abolished and this chapter expires September 1, 2025.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2315), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.